North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 1. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees.
“2. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the teacher’s respective local school administrative unit according to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth or fifth grade reading from the previous school year.

“b. Qualifying Teacher. — An eligible teacher who remains teaching in the same local school administrative unit or, if the teacher is not employed in a local school administrative unit, remains teaching in the same school at least from the school year
the data for the EVAAS student growth index score is collected until January 1 of the school year a bonus provided under this subsection is paid.

“(2) Of the funds appropriated for this program, the Department of Public Instruction shall allocate the sum of four million two hundred ninety-eight thousand seven hundred thirty-eight dollars ($4,298,738) to award a bonus in the amount of two thousand
dollars ($2,000) to each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision (1)a.1. of this subsection.

“(3) Of the funds appropriated for this program, the Department of Public Instruction shall allocate the sum of four million two hundred ninety-eight thousand seven hundred thirty-eight dollars ($4,298,738) to award a bonus in the amount of two thousand
dollars ($2,000) to each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision (1)a.2. of this subsection, subject to the following conditions:

“a. Teachers employed in charter schools, regional schools, and University of North Carolina laboratory schools are not eligible to receive a bonus under this subdivision.

“b. Any qualifying teacher who taught in a local school administrative unit that employed in the previous school year three or fewer total teachers in the qualifying teacher’s grade level shall receive a bonus under this subdivision if that teacher has
an EVAAS student growth index score for fourth or fifth grade reading from the previous school year of exceeded expected growth.

“(4) Bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection are payable in January to qualifying teachers based on EVAAS student growth index score data from the previous school year.

“(5) A qualifying teacher may receive a bonus under both subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection.

“(6) The bonus or bonuses awarded to a qualifying teacher pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any regular wage or other bonus the teacher receives or is scheduled to receive.

“(7) No teacher shall receive more than two bonuses pursuant to this section.

“(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the bonuses awarded by this section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes, the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System.

“(c) The State Board of Education shall study the effect of the bonuses awarded pursuant to this section on teacher performance and retention. The State Board shall report the results of its findings, the distribution of statewide bonuses as among local
school administrative units, and the distribution of bonuses within local school administrative units as among individual schools to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division by March 15 of each year bonuses are awarded.”

Fourth to Eighth Grade Math Teacher Bonus Program for 2017-2018.
Session Laws 2017-57, s. 8.8E(a)-(c), as amended by Session Laws 2018-5, s. 8.12(a), provides: “(a) It is the intent of the State to reward teacher performance and encourage student learning and improvement. To attain this
goal, the Department of Public Instruction shall administer the Fourth to Eighth Grade Mathematics Teacher Bonus Program (program) to qualifying teachers who have an Education Value-Added Assessment System (EVAAS) student growth index
score for fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics from the previous school year, as follows:

“(1) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

“a. Eligible Teacher. — A teacher who meets one or both of the following criteria:

“1. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State according to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics from the previous school year.

“2. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the teacher’s respective local school administrative unit according to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics from the previous school
year.

“b. Qualifying Teacher. — An eligible teacher who remains teaching in the same local school administrative unit or, if the teacher is not employed in a local school administrative unit, remains teaching in the same school at least from the school year
the data for the EVAAS student growth index score is collected until January 1 of the school year a bonus provided under this subsection is paid.

“(2) Of the funds appropriated for this program, the Department of Public Instruction shall allocate the sum of seven million one hundred fifty-one thousand two hundred sixty-two dollars ($7,151,262) to award a bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars
($2,000) to each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision (1)a.1. of this subsection.

“(3) Of the funds appropriated for this program, the Department of Public Instruction shall allocate the sum of seven million one hundred fifty-one thousand two hundred sixty-two dollars ($7,151,262) to award a bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars
($2,000) to each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision (1)a.2. of this subsection, subject to the following conditions:

“a. Teachers employed in charter schools, regional schools, and University of North Carolina laboratory schools are not eligible to receive a bonus under this subdivision.

“b. Any qualifying teacher who taught in a local school administrative unit that employed in the previous school year three or fewer total teachers in the qualifying teacher’s grade level shall receive a bonus under this subdivision if that teacher has
an EVAAS student growth index score for fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics from the previous school year of exceeded expected growth.

(4) Bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection are payable in January to qualifying teachers based on EVAAS student growth index score data from the previous school year.

“(5) A qualifying teacher may receive a bonus under both subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection.

“(6) The bonus or bonuses awarded to a qualifying teacher pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any regular wage or other bonus the teacher receives or is scheduled to receive.

“(7) No teacher shall receive more than two bonuses pursuant to this section.

“(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the bonuses awarded by this section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes, the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System.

“(c) The State Board of Education shall study the effect of the bonuses awarded pursuant to this section on teacher performance and retention. The State Board shall report the results of its findings, the distribution of statewide bonuses as among local
school administrative units, and the distribution of bonuses within local school administrative units as among individual schools to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division by March 15 of each year bonuses are awarded.”

Joint Legislative Study Committee on Small Business Retirement Options.
Session Laws 2019-205, ss. 1-5, as amended by Session Laws 2020-3, s. 4.37(a), provides: “SECTION 1. There is created the Joint Legislative Study Committee on Small Business Retirement Options (the Committee). The Committee
shall consist of 10 members appointed as follows:

“(1) One Representative appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives who shall serve as a cochair to the Committee.

“(2) One Senator appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate who shall serve as a cochair to the Committee.

“(3) One Representative appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.

“(4) One Senator appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.

“(5) The Treasurer or the Treasurer’s designee.

“(6) The Secretary of Revenue or the Secretary’s designee.

“(7) Two members of the public appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, one of whom is an individual representing an organization for older adults and one of whom is a retiree with professional knowledge of and experience working in the
private retirement services industry.

“(8) Two members of the public appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, one of whom is a business owner and one of whom is a labor advocate.

“SECTION 2. The Committee shall study all of the following:

“(1) Ways the State can reduce the regulatory and operational burden on small businesses that want to offer payroll deduction retirement savings options to employees.

“(2) Mechanisms the State could use to assist citizens to be more prepared to retire in a financially secure manner, including the operation of a State-administered Individual Retirement Account or multiple employer plan.

“(3) The feasibility and benefits of partnering with other similar programs established in other jurisdictions.

“(4) Optimal oversight for any proposed retirement program.

“SECTION 3. The Committee shall meet upon the joint call of the cochairs. A majority shall constitute a quorum of the Committee, and no official action may be taken except by a majority vote at a meeting at which a quorum is present. While in the discharge
of its official duties, the Committee shall have the powers under

G.S. 120-19

and

G.S. 120-19.1

through

G.S. 120-19.4

.

“SECTION 4. Members of the Committee shall receive subsistence and travel expenses as provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

, 138-5, or 138-6, as appropriate. The Committee may contract for consultants or hire employees in

G.S. 120-32.02

. The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Committee in its work. Upon the direction of the Legislative Services Commission, the Supervisors
of Clerks of the Senate and of the House of Representatives shall assign clerical staff to the Committee.

“SECTION 5. The Committee shall report its interim findings and recommendations, including any recommended legislation, to the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Fiscal Research Division no later
than March 31, 2020. The Committee shall report its final findings and recommendations, including any recommended legislation, to the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Fiscal
Research Division no later than December 1, 2020. The Committee shall terminate upon submission of the final report or August 1, 2020, whichever occurs first.”

Correctional Facility High-Need Salary Supplements.
Session Laws 2019-208, s. 4.1(a)-(g), provides: “(a) Employees of the Department of Public Safety (Department) serving in high-need correctional facilities having the highest numbers of vacant positions are eligible to receive
flat-dollar salary supplements, payable monthly, for up to a two-year period.

“(b) The base supplement rate shall be an amount calculated by the Department based on the requirements of this section. The minimum base supplement rate that shall be provided to employees serving in a high-need correctional facility is two thousand
five hundred dollars ($2,500) annually.

“(c) There are three levels of high-need correctional facilities based upon the facility’s respective staffing difficulty:

“(1) Level I — If the correctional facility has had a vacancy rate of at least twenty percent (20%) for at least 12 months in the prior biennium, employees assigned to this facility shall receive a salary supplement equal to the base supplement rate.

“(2) Level II — If the correctional facility has had a vacancy rate of at least twenty-five percent (25%) for at least 12 months in the prior biennium, employees assigned to this facility shall receive a salary supplement equal to twice the base supplement
rate.

“(3) Level III — If the correctional facility has had a vacancy rate of at least thirty percent (30%) for at least 12 months in the prior biennium, employees assigned to this facility shall receive a salary supplement equal to three times the base supplement
rate.

“(d) The salary supplement rates assigned to each high-need correctional facility at the beginning of each fiscal biennium by the Department shall remain in effect for the facility throughout the respective fiscal biennium. The Department shall re-designate
high-need facilities at the beginning of each subsequent fiscal biennium based on the criteria in subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

“(e) The Department may exclude a facility from eligibility to prioritize larger supplements to greater-need facilities or if the vacancy rate does not accurately reflect a facility’s actual staffing needs. The Department may assign a lower level to a
facility if the assignment would more accurately reflect the facility’s needs. The Department shall not provide supplements in facilities that do not meet the minimum criteria specified in subsection (c) of this section.

“(f) Funds appropriated for high-need facility salary supplements may only be expended for that purpose. At the end of each fiscal year, any remaining funding appropriated for the supplements shall be distributed proportionally to employees at high-need
facilities who were employed at a designated facility for the entire fiscal year.

“(g) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the supplements awarded pursuant to this section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes, Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees.”

Employment of School Personnel.
Session Laws 2021-7, s. 1.3(a)-(b), provides: “Employment of School Personnel. — For each local school administrative unit operating the program, the following shall apply:

“(1) Notwithstanding Articles 19, 20, 21, and Part 3 of Article 22 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes, a local board of education shall employ teachers and other school personnel as temporary employees on a contract basis for the period of the program.
School personnel employed as temporary employees by a local board of education pursuant to this act shall not be considered an ’employee’ as defined in

G.S. 135-1(10)

or a ’teacher’ as defined in

G.S. 135-1(25)

, nor shall it cause school personnel to be considered an ’employee or State employee’ under G.S. 135-48.1(10). In addition, school personnel shall not be deemed as earning ’compensation’ as defined in G.S. 135-1(7a)
and shall not be eligible to accrue paid leave during their temporary employment.

“(2) For individuals who retired under the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System (TSERS) on or after December 1, 2020, but on or before March 1, 2021, the six-month separation from service from an employer that is required under

G.S. 135-1(20)

in order for a retirement to become effective shall not apply and instead a one-month separation shall be required, provided that the position to which the individual returns is as a teacher or other school personnel
employed as a temporary employee on a contract basis for the program as required in subdivision (1) of this section. Upon the expiration of this section, all of the following shall apply:

“a. The six-month separation from an employer required under

G.S. 135-1(20)

shall again be applicable to individuals who retired under TSERS on or after December 1, 2020, but on or before March 1, 2021.

“b. In order for a member’s retirement under TSERS on or after December 1, 2020, but on or before March 1, 2021, to become effective in any month, the member must perform no work for an employer, including part-time, temporary, substitute, or contractor
work, at any time between the expiration of this section and the end of the six months immediately following the effective date of retirement, provided the expiration of the six-month period of separation did not occur while this section
was in effect.

“c. For individuals who retired under TSERS on or after December 1, 2020, but before March 1, 2021, any time worked in the program and the time this section expires shall not be considered work for the purposes of the six-month separation required under

G.S. 135-1(20)

.

“d. For purposes of this subdivision, local school administrative units shall certify to the Retirement System that a retirement system beneficiary is employed by the local board of education.

“(3) From funds available, local boards shall offer a signing bonus of at least one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) to any teacher who (i) had received a past teaching bonus for reading in grades three, four, and five or mathematics in grades four,
five, six, seven, or eight or (ii) has received National Board for Professional Teaching Standards Certification. Local boards of education are encouraged to find ways to incentivize highly effective teachers to participate in the
program, such as increased compensation and varied contract durations.

“(4) Local boards of education shall provide a performance bonus to a teacher who provided instruction during the program, in a per student amount of at least one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00), for each student not demonstrating reading proficiency
on the third-grade end-of-grade reading assessment assigned to that teacher who became proficient in reading after completing the program, as demonstrated by an alternate assessment.

“(b) This section is effective when it becomes law [April 9, 2021] and expires October 1, 2021.”